Hawaii statutes.
§490:4-212 Presentment by notice of item
not payable by, through, or at a bank; liability of drawer or indorser.
(a) Unless otherwise instructed, a collecting bank may present an item not
payable by, through, or at a bank by sending to the party to accept or pay a
written notice that the bank holds the item for acceptance or payment. The
notice must be sent in time to be received on or before the day when
presentment is due and the bank must meet any requirement of the party to
accept or pay under section 490:3-501 by the close of the bank's next banking
day after it knows of the requirement.

(b) If presentment is made by notice and
payment, acceptance, or request for compliance with a requirement under section
490:3-501 is not received by the close of business on the day after maturity
or, in the case of demand items, by the close of business on the third banking
day after notice was sent, the presenting bank may treat the item as dishonored
and charge any drawer or indorser by sending it notice of the facts. [L 1965, c
208, §4-210; HRS §490:4-210; am and ren L 1991, c 118, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next